Idaho statutes. Title 66 STATE CHARITABLE INSTITUTIONS
Chapter 10
IDAHO TUBERCULOSIS HOSPITAL

Sec.

§ 66-1001. Establishment of tuberculosis hospital.

A hospital for the care and treatment of persons having tuberculosis shall be established, remodeled, and equipped by the state of Idaho upon certain property belonging to Gooding College of the Methodist Episcopal Church, situated near the City of Gooding, in Gooding County, state of Idaho, described as acreage tracts 26, 31, 32 and 37 South Gooding Acreage, containing approximately 40 acres of land, provided that said property together with the water rights appurtenant thereto and all building and appurtenants thereon be, within ninety (90) days after the enactment of this bill, donated to the state of Idaho free and clear of all mortgages and other incumbrances thereon.

§ 66-1002. Acceptance of funds authorized.

For the purpose of making available additional funds for assisting in carrying out the provisions of this act the board of health and welfare of the state of Idaho is hereby authorized to accept for and on behalf of the state of Idaho from any department or agency, or other instrumentality of the United States Government, a grant or donation of money for the remodeling, equipment and/or operation of said hospital, and to use the same for such remodeling, equipment and/or operation.

§ 66-1003. Remodeling and equipment of hospital.

As soon as practicable after the acquirement of the site and the title thereto, the board of health and welfare shall proceed with the remodeling and equipment of said hospital, procedure to be regulated by stipulations concerning construction of public buildings.

§ 66-1004. Delegation of responsibility for hospitalization of patients.

The board of health and welfare, in addition to all other powers granted it by law, is hereby authorized, empowered and directed to assume responsibility for the direction, operation, and control of the hospitalization of tuberculosis patients in said hospital.

§ 66-1005. Provision for transfer of power.

In the event the functions now vesting in the division of public health, of the department of public welfare [board of health and welfare] shall hereinafter vest in or be transferred to any other office or department, the powers and duties of the division of public health [board] shall likewise vest in such office or department.

§ 66-1006. Separability.

The provisions of this act are hereby declared to be severable, and if any provisions of this act or application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect the other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

§ 66-1007. Transfer of powers and duties to department of public health [board of health and welfare].

All powers and duties vested by title 66, chapter 10, Idaho Code, in the charitable institutions commission over the Idaho Tuberculosis Hospital in Gooding County, Idaho, are hereby transferred to and vested in the department of public health [board of health and welfare] of the state of Idaho.